Massachusetts, session 194th, H4151.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. To provide for supplementing certain items in the general appropriation act
2 and other appropriation acts for fiscal year 2025, the sums set forth in section 2 are hereby
3 appropriated from the General Fund unless specifically designated otherwise in this act or in
4 those appropriation acts, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this
5 act or in those appropriation acts, and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public
6 funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. These sums shall be in addition to any amounts
7 previously appropriated and made available for the purposes of those items. These sums shall be
8 made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.
9 SECTION 2.
1 of 27

10 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF VETERANS’ SERVICES
11 1410-0400 Veterans’ Benefits ………………..…………………………………. $5,800,000
12 OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER
13 1599-3384 Settlements and Judgments………………………………………… $28,917,460
14 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION
15 Department of Early Education and Care
16 3000-3060 DCF and DTA Related Child Care………………………………… $95,554,342
17 Education and Transportation Fund……100%
18 3000-4060 Income-Eligible Child Care………………………………………... $94,015,214
19 Education and Transportation Fund……100%
20 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
21 1595-1068 Medical Assistance Trust Fund……………………………………. $134,498,420
22 Department of Transitional Assistance
23 4400-1004 Healthy Incentives Program……………………………………….. $7,500,000
24 4405-2000 State Supplement to the Social Security Income program…………. $3,000,000
25 4408-1000 Emergency Aid to Elderly, Disabled and Children………………... $1,000,000
26 Department of Public Health
2 of 27

27 4513-1012 Women Infants and Children Program Manufacturer Rebates……. $400,000
28 4590-0912 Western Massachusetts Hospital Retained Revenue………………. $1,200,000
29 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES
30 Office of the Secretary of Housing and Livable Communities
31 7004-9316 Residential Assistance for Families in Transition…………………. $42,910,506
32 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY
33 State Police
34 8100-0006 Private Detail Retained Revenue………………………………….. $7,750,000
35 8100-1004 State Police Crime Laboratory…………………………………….. $4,193,083
36 Military Division
37 8700-0001 Military Division…………………………………………………… $593,539
38 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF AGING AND INDEPENDENCE
39 Office of the Secretary
40 9110-1630 Home Care Services………………………………………………... $60,000,000
41 SECTION 2A. To provide for certain unanticipated obligations of the commonwealth, to
42 provide for an alteration of purpose for current appropriations, and to meet certain requirements
43 of law, the sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the General Fund unless
44 specifically designated otherwise in this section, for the several purposes and subject to the
3 of 27

45 conditions specified in this section, and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public
46 funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. Except as otherwise stated, these sums shall be
47 made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
48 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
49 Reserves
50 1599-1776 For a reserve to support celebrations of the United States’ semiquincentennial
51 anniversary; provided, that funds may be made available for statewide initiatives to promote the
52 anniversary and for grants to municipalities for public safety, transportation and logistical costs
53 associated with anniversary celebrations; and provided further, that at the direction of the
54 secretary of administration and finance, funds may be transferred from this item to the
55 Massachusetts Tourism Trust Fund established in section 13T of chapter 23A of the General
56 Laws………………………………………………………………………………... $15,000,000
57 1599-1777 For a reserve to support capital improvements to the Edward A. LeLacheur park
58 at the University of Massachusetts Lowell………………….……………..………. $6,000,000
59 1599-1778 For a reserve to support the creation of the Brooke House in Mattapan by 2Life
60 Development Inc.; provided, that the Brooke House shall create and maintain not less than 127
61 units of senior housing; provided further, that the housing shall be reserved for seniors with
62 incomes of not more than 60 per cent of the area median income; provided further, that the
63 Brooke House shall include space for the Shattuck Child Care Center; and provided further, that
64 the Brooke House shall include space for a community health care center that shall provide
65 services to the broader community………………………………………………… $2,000,000
4 of 27

66 1599-1779 For a transfer to the Fair Housing Fund established in section 2JJJJJJ of chapter
67 29 of the General Laws…………………………………………………………………$1,000,000
68 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
69 Department of Transitional Assistance
70 4400-1033 For the costs associated with the transition to chipped electronic benefits transfer
71 cards by the department of transitional assistance; provided, that at the direction of the
72 commissioner of transitional assistance, funds may be transferred from this item to item 4400-
73 1000 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024; and provided further, that funds
74 appropriated in this item shall be made not revert but shall be made available for these purposes
75 through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027……………………………………… $15,500,000
76 Department of Public Health
77 4510-0794 For competitive grants to reimburse municipalities for extraordinary emergency
78 medical service costs; provided, that funds in this item shall be administered by the department
79 of public health and shall be reimbursed based on eligibility criteria established by the
80 department………………………………………………………………………….. $10,000,000
81 SECTION 3. Section 40 of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
82 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof
83 the following subsection:-
84 (d) The boards of trustees for each state-operated veterans’ home may receive donations
85 to benefit the homes. The state treasurer shall receive, deposit and invest all donations made to
86 the state-operated veterans’ homes. The trustees may expend the donated funds for the direct
5 of 27

87 benefit of the veterans who reside in the state-operated veterans’ homes, acting as fiduciaries
88 with the care, skill and diligence that a prudent person would use.
89 SECTION 4. Section 61 of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
90 amended by striking out, in line 132, the words “March 15” and inserting in place thereof the
91 following words:- June 1.
92 SECTION 4A. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
93 section 35M the following section:-
94 Section 35M1/2. (a) There shall be established upon the books of the commonwealth a
95 separate fund to be known as the Medical Peer Support Trust Fund to be used, without prior
96 appropriation, by the physician health program authorized by the board of registration in
97 medicine pursuant to section 5 of chapter 112 and 243 CMR 2.07(23)(b) as a diversionary
98 program.
99 (b) The Medical Peer Support Trust Fund shall be financed by a surcharge of not more
100 than $50 on each full license renewal or issuance of a new full license to be collected by the
101 board of registration in medicine for every physician licensed under section 2 of said chapter 112
102 in addition to other license fees. All money deposited into the fund shall be expended exclusively
103 by the physician health program pursuant to said section 5 of said chapter 112 and said 243 CMR
104 2.07(23)(b) for its operations and administration and shall not be subject to appropriation by the
105 general court.
106 SECTION 5. Section 11M of chapter 12 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
107 amended by striking out, in lines 52 to 54, inclusive, the words “; provided, however, that the
6 of 27

108 commission shall not approve such a request if the request would exceed an annual
109 reimbursement of $3,000,000”.
110 SECTION 6. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
111 section 2JJJJJJ, inserted by section 7 of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024, the following section:-
112 Section 2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
113 commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Office of the
114 Inspector General Recovery Fund, which shall be administered by the office of the inspector
115 general. The fund shall be credited with any monies payable to the inspector general from civil
116 recoveries, settlement funds or recoupment of administrative and investigatory costs and may
117 earn and be credited interest.
118 (b) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, for the
119 office of the inspector general’s operational, administrative and investigatory purposes.
120 (c) The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available
121 for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the
122 fund to be in deficit at any point.
123 SECTION 7. The third paragraph of section 33 of chapter 31 of the General Laws, as
124 appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word
125 “employment”, in line 52, the following words:- ; provided, however, that the length of service
126 of a person appointed through an original appointment to a civil service position of municipal
127 police officer or fire officer from a local public safety register pursuant to section 59A shall be
128 calculated from and, in all instances shall remain, the date of such original appointment from the
7 of 27

129 register and shall not be subject to adjustment at any time for prior employment by the
130 commonwealth or another city or town.
131 SECTION 8. The second paragraph of section 59 of said chapter 31, as amended by
132 section 145 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the
133 words “three years after certification” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 3
134 years after appointment and performance of the job duties.
135 SECTION 9. Subsection (a) of section 59A of said chapter 31, inserted by section 147 of
136 said chapter 238, is hereby amended by striking out the words “police and firefighter” and
137 inserting in place thereof the following words:- police, MBTA police and municipal firefighter.
138 SECTION 10. Said section 59A of said chapter 31, as inserted by said section 147 of said
139 chapter 238, is hereby further amended by adding the following subsection:-
140 (h) Notwithstanding any prior appointments, for any person who receives an appointment
141 pursuant to this section, the local public safety register appointment date shall be considered the
142 person’s seniority date for all purposes under this chapter.
143 SECTION 11. Section 75 of said chapter 31, as amended by section 161 of said chapter
144 238, is hereby further amended by adding the following sentence:- Nothing in this section shall
145 be construed to permit civil service employees to furnish information to, or cooperate with, law
146 enforcement authorities in contravention of section 11I½ of chapter 12.
147 SECTION 11A. Section 1B of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
148 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the thirteenth paragraph the following
149 paragraph:-
8 of 27

150 The board shall ensure meaningful communication between school personnel and parents
151 and legal guardians of all students receiving educational services pursuant to this chapter, chapter
152 71, 71A, 71B or 74. The board shall ensure that interpreters and translators used in public school
153 settings are bilingual, have knowledge in both languages of any specialized terms or concepts to
154 be used in the communication at issue and that interpreters are trained on the role of an
155 interpreter and translator, the ethics of interpreting and translating and the need to maintain
156 confidentiality.
157 SECTION 11B. Section 4 of chapter 71A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
158 amended by inserting after the word “component.”, in line 13, the following words:- Each
159 district shall, within a reasonable amount of time, ensure that any academic deficits for a student
160 that are a result of focusing on English language acquisition are addressed.
161 SECTION 11C. Section 5 of said chapter 71A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
162 adding the following subsection:-
163 (c) School districts shall not recommend that parents or legal guardians decline all or
164 some services within an English learner program for any reason, including, but not limited to,
165 facilitating scheduling of special education services or other scheduling reasons.
166 SECTION 11D. Section 3 of chapter 71B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
167 amended by inserting after the word “development.”, in line 145, the following 4 sentences:-
168 When conducting an evaluation for a child who is an English learner, as defined in section 2 of
169 chapter 71A, school committees shall consider the English language proficiency of the student.
170 Assessments and other evaluation materials used to evaluate the child shall be provided and
171 administered in the child’s primary language and in the form most likely to yield accurate
9 of 27

172 information on what the child knows and can do academically, developmentally and
173 functionally. The Individualized Education Program team convened for an English learner shall
174 include 1 or more participants with the following: (i) a requisite knowledge of the student’s
175 language needs; (ii) training and expertise in second language acquisition; and (iii) an
176 understanding of how to differentiate between the student’s limited English proficiency and the
177 student’s disability. Whenever an evaluation indicates that a child who is an English learner is
178 also a school aged child with a disability, the Individualized Education Program team shall
179 ensure that the Individualized Education Program includes services to meet both the English
180 language and special education needs of the child.
181 SECTION 11E. The ninth paragraph of said section 3 of said chapter 71B, as so
182 appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- The department shall
183 promulgate regulations to continue in effect and enforce the provisions of 20 USC sec.1415(k) in
184 effect on January 1, 2025.
185 SECTION 11F. Section 5 of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
186 amended by inserting after the word “origin”, in line 11, the following words:- , immigration or
187 citizenship status, disability.
188 SECTION 12. Section 7I of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
189 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “vehicles”, in line 8, the
190 following words:- and vehicles operated by the Massachusetts emergency management agency.
191 SECTION 13. Section 1 of chapter 90F of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
192 amended by striking out, in line 65, the words “(49 App. USC 1801 et seq.)” and inserting in
193 place thereof the following words:- (49 U.S.C. 5101 et seq.).
10 of 27

194 SECTION 14. Section 4 of said chapter 90F, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
195 striking out, in line 17, the words “of from $2,750 to $11,000 inclusive” and inserting in place
196 thereof the following words:- as required under subsection (b)(2) of Appendix B of 49 C.F.R.
197 386.
198 SECTION 15. Said section 4 of said chapter 90F, as so appearing, is hereby further
199 amended by striking out, in lines 22 and 23, the words “of not more than $10,000” and inserting
200 in place thereof the following words:- as required under subsection (b)(3) of Appendix B of 49
201 C.F.R. 386.
202 SECTION 16. Section 9 of said chapter 90F, as amended by chapter 313 of the acts of
203 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out paragraph (D) and inserting in place thereof the
204 following paragraph:-
205 (D) Any person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for life
206 for: (i) using a commercial motor vehicle or a motor vehicle in the commission of any felony
207 involving the manufacture, distribution or dispensing of a controlled substance or possession
208 with intent to manufacture, distribute or dispense a controlled substance; or (ii) using a
209 commercial motor vehicle in the commission of any felony involving trafficking in persons or
210 organs as prohibited by sections 50, 51 or 53 of chapter 265 or any felony involving an act or
211 practice of severe forms of trafficking in persons, as defined in 22 U.S.C. 7102(11).
212 SECTION 17. Subparagraph (3) of paragraph (E½) of said section 9 of said chapter 90F,
213 as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 66
214 and 67, the words “of not less than $1,100 and not more than $2,750” and inserting in place
11 of 27

215 thereof the following words:- as required under subsection (b)(1) of Appendix B of 49 C.F.R.
216 386.
217 SECTION 17A. Subsection (c) of section 34E of chapter 92 of the General Laws, as so
218 appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 35 to 45, inclusive, the words “1 member
219 to be appointed by a majority vote of the senator for the Second Suffolk and Middlesex district,
220 the senator for the Middlesex and Suffolk district, the representative for the Seventeenth Suffolk
221 district and the representative for the Eighteenth Suffolk district, who shall serve as chair; 2
222 members to be appointed by the senator for the Second Suffolk and Middlesex district; 2
223 members to be appointed by the senator for the Middlesex and Suffolk district; 2 members to be
224 appointed by the representative for the Seventeenth Suffolk district; and 2 members to be
225 appointed by the representative for the Eighteenth Suffolk district.” and inserting in place thereof
226 the following words:- 3 members to be appointed by the senator for the Suffolk and Middlesex
227 district; 3 members to be appointed by the representative for the Seventeenth Suffolk district; and
228 3 members to be appointed by the representative for the Eighteenth Suffolk district.
229 SECTION 18. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
230 following section:-
231 Section 249. (a) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 1 of chapter
232 94C shall apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
233 (b) At the commissioner’s discretion, a pharmacy operated by the department may
234 distribute controlled substances to health care providers and entities legally authorized to
235 administer, possess, distribute, deliver or dispense controlled substances; provided, that such
236 controlled substances shall be: (i) related to the provision of reproductive health care services, as
12 of 27

237 defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12; or (ii) used to ensure access to controlled substances
238 needed to provide treatment in the event of a public health emergency declared pursuant to
239 section 2A of chapter 17.
240 (c) The department may exercise the authority granted in this section for the benefit of
241 any person, whether or not the person is under the custody, care or supervision of an agency of
242 the commonwealth.
243 (d) The department shall exercise the authority granted in this section in accordance with
244 applicable law, including, but not limited to, applicable controlled substances registration
245 requirements; provided, however, that the department shall be exempt from obtaining a
246 pharmacy license in accordance with section 39 of chapter 112.
247 SECTION 19. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
248 section 6 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
249 Section 6. (a) There shall be a MassHealth program advisory committee to advise the
250 executive office on matters of concern related to policy development and matters related to
251 effective program administration. The assistant secretary for MassHealth or their designee shall
252 select members for the advisory committee on a rotating and continuous basis in such numbers
253 and for such terms as the executive office deems appropriate.
254 (b) The MassHealth program advisory committee shall include at a minimum: (i) 1
255 member of the MassHealth member advisory committee; (ii) 1 member of a state or local
256 consumer group or other community-based organization that represents the interests of, or
257 provides direct service to, MassHealth beneficiaries; (iii) 1 clinical provider or administrator who
258 is familiar with the health and social needs of MassHealth beneficiaries and with the resources
13 of 27

259 available and required for their care, including, but not limited to, providers or administrators of
260 primary care, specialty care and long-term care; (iv) as applicable, 1 member of a Medicaid-
261 participating managed care entity, including, but not limited to, managed care organizations,
262 accountable care partnership plans, primary care accountable care organizations, one care plans,
263 senior care options plans, the behavioral health vendor or the primary care clinician plan; and (v)
264 1 member of any other state agency that serves MassHealth beneficiaries, who shall serve as an
265 ex officio, non-voting member.
266 (c) The executive office shall provide the committee with such staff and technical
267 assistance as necessary to enable the committee to make effective recommendations and such
268 financial arrangements as necessary to make possible the participation of recipient members.
269 (d) Annually, not later than October 1, the office of Medicaid shall report to the joint
270 committee on health care financing and the house and senate committees on ways and means on
271 the activities of the MassHealth program advisory committee in the previous fiscal year. The
272 report shall include, but shall not be limited to, the names and titles of committee members, dates
273 of committee meetings, agendas and minutes or notes from such meetings and any
274 correspondence, memorandum, recommendations or other product of the committee’s work.
275 MassHealth member advisory committee members shall have the option to omit their names
276 from the report.
277 SECTION 20. Said chapter 118E is hereby further amended by striking out section 9F,
278 added by section 117 of chapter 224 of the acts of 2012, and inserting in place thereof the
279 following section:-
14 of 27

280 Section 9F. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
281 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
282 “Dual eligible”, or “dually eligible person”, any person age 21 or older and under age 65
283 at the time of enrollment in a dual eligible managed care organization who is enrolled in both
284 Medicare and MassHealth.
285 “Dual eligible managed care organization”, a comprehensive network of medical, health
286 care and long-term services and supports providers that integrates all components of care, either
287 directly or through subcontracts, and has been contracted with by the executive office to provide
288 services to dually eligible individuals under this section.
289 (b) The secretary of health and human services may establish, subject to appropriation, all
290 required federal approvals and agreements and the availability of federal financial participation,
291 a health care program for dual eligible individuals, aged 21 to 64 at the time of enrollment, who
292 are dually eligible for benefits under MassHealth Standard or CommonHealth and Medicare
293 under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act and do not have any additional comprehensive
294 health coverage. Under the program, the executive office may contract to provide integrated,
295 comprehensive Medicaid and Medicare services, including medical, behavioral health and long-
296 term support services for a capitated payment.
297 (c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of health and
298 human services may review a request for financial solvency certification by a care delivery
299 organization based in the commonwealth applying to serve as a Medicare plan caring for
300 residents who are dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid. Upon determination that
301 appropriate financial standards, which may be the standards already in place for organizations
15 of 27

302 with contracts pursuant to this section, have been met, the secretary of health and human services
303 shall so certify to the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services. The secretary of health and
304 human services may require the requesting organization to pay a reasonable certification fee.
305 (d) Members of the MassHealth managed care program integrating care for dually
306 eligible persons shall be provided an independent community care coordinator by the dual
307 eligible managed care organization, who shall be a participant in the member’s care team. The
308 community care coordinator shall assist in the development of a long-term support and services
309 care plan. The community care coordinator shall:
310 (i) participate in initial and ongoing assessments of the health and functional status of the
311 member, including determining appropriateness for long-term care support and services, either in
312 the form of institutional or community-based care plans and related service packages necessary
313 to improve or maintain enrollee health and functional status;
314 (ii) arrange and, with the agreement of the member and the care team, coordinate
315 appropriate institutional and community long-term supports and services, including assistance
316 with the activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living, housing, home-
317 delivered meals, transportation and, under specific conditions or circumstances established by
318 the dual eligible managed care organization, authorize a range and amount of community-based
319 services; and
320 (iii) monitor the appropriate provision and functional outcomes of community long-term
321 care services, according to the service plan as deemed appropriate by the member and the care
322 team and track member satisfaction and the appropriate provision and functional outcomes of
16 of 27

323 community long-term care services, according to the service plan as deemed appropriate by the
324 member and the care team.
325 (e) The dual eligible managed care organization shall not have a direct or indirect
326 financial ownership interest in an entity that serves as an independent care coordinator. Providers
327 of institutional or community based long-term services and supports on a compensated basis
328 shall not function as an independent care coordinator; provided, however, that the secretary may
329 grant a waiver of this restriction upon a finding that public necessity and convenience require
330 such a waiver. For the purposes of this section, an organization compensated to provide only
331 evaluation, assessment, coordination, skills training, peer support and fiscal intermediary
332 services shall not be considered a provider of long term services and supports.
333 SECTION 21. Section 10H1/2 of said chapter 118E, inserted by section 2 of chapter 388
334 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in
335 place thereof the following paragraph:-
336 The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
337 organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
338 to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage
339 for the treatment of Down syndrome through medically necessary speech therapy, occupational
340 therapy, physical therapy and, for individuals under the age of 21, applied behavior analysis
341 services.
342 SECTION 22. Said chapter 118E is hereby further amended by adding the following
343 section:-
17 of 27

344 Section 87. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
345 office may directly pay other state agencies, including county correctional facilities and
346 department of correction facilities operated by such state agencies, for any claims related to
347 Medicaid, under the provisions of Title XIX of the Social Security Act, the children’s health
348 insurance program, under the provisions of Title XXI of the Social Security Act, the health
349 safety net, under the provisions of sections 64 through 69, the children’s medical security plan,
350 under the provisions of section 10F, and other similar healthcare programs; provided, that such
351 state agencies meet all applicable conditions of participation in these programs, as determined by
352 the executive office in its sole discretion.
353 SECTION 22A. Section 131M of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as amended by
354 section 71 of chapter 135 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out
355 subsection (e) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
356 (e) This section shall not apply to transfer or possession by: (i) a qualified law
357 enforcement officer or a qualified retired law enforcement officer, as defined in the Law
358 Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004, 18 U.S.C. sections 926B and 926C, respectively, as
359 amended; (ii) a law enforcement officer as defined in section 1 of chapter 6E; (iii) a federal, state
360 or local law enforcement agency; or (iv) a federally licensed manufacturer solely for sale or
361 transfer in another state or for export.
362 SECTION 22B. Section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as amended by section
363 122 of said chapter 135 is hereby further amended by striking out the words “or a qualified
364 retired law enforcement officer, as defined in the Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004,
365 18 U.S.C. sections 926B and 926C, respectively, as amended” and inserting in place thereof the
18 of 27

366 following words:- , a qualified retired law enforcement officer, as defined in the Law
367 Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004, 18 U.S.C. sections 926B and 926C, respectively, as
368 amended or a law enforcement officer as defined in section 1 of chapter 6E.
369 SECTION 22C. Subsection (k) of said section 10 of said chapter 269, as inserted by
370 section 124 of said chapter 135, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (5) and inserting in
371 its place thereof the following paragraph:-
372 (5) This subsection shall not apply to a law enforcement officer as defined in section 1 of
373 chapter 6E a qualified law enforcement officer or a qualified retired law enforcement officer, as
374 defined in the Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004, 18 U.S.C. sections 926B and 926C,
375 respectively, as amended or to a security guard employed at the prohibited area while at the
376 location of their employment and during the course of their employment. Nothing in this
377 paragraph shall limit the authority of any municipality, county or department, division,
378 commission, board, agency or court of the commonwealth to adopt policies further restricting the
379 possession of firearms in areas under their control.
380 SECTION 22D. Subsection (d) of section 149 of chapter 135 of the acts of 2024 is
381 hereby amended by striking out the words “March 1, 2025” and inserting in place thereof the
382 following words:- December 31, 2025.
383 SECTION 23. Item 0910-0210 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
384 amended by inserting after the word “system” the following words:- ; provided further, that
385 notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, funds may be collected in the prior
386 fiscal year for service programs or activities delivered during the next fiscal year; and provided
19 of 27

387 further, that any unspent balance at the close of the current fiscal year up to the ceiling shall
388 remain in the account and may be expended for the item in the following fiscal year.
389 SECTION 23A. Item 4405-2000 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
390 amended by striking out the words “provided further, that rates for residential care facilities and
391 rest homes effective July 1, 2024, established under section 13D of chapter 118E of the General
392 Laws, shall cumulatively total not less than rates effective January 1, 2024” and inserting in
393 place thereof the following words:- provided further, that rates for residential care facilities and
394 rest homes effective July 1, 2024, established under section 13D of chapter 118E of the General
395 Laws, shall cumulatively total not less than $3,000,000 more than rates effective January 1,
396 2024.
397 SECTION 23B. Item 4408-1000 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
398 by striking out the words “provided further, that rates for residential care facilities and rest
399 homes effective July 1, 2024, established under section 13D of chapter 118E of the General
400 Laws, shall cumulatively total not less than rates effective January 1, 2024” and inserting in
401 place thereof the following words:- provided further, that rates for residential care facilities and
402 rest homes effective July 1, 2024, established under section 13D of chapter 118E of the General
403 Laws, shall cumulatively total not less than $1,000,000 more than rates effective January 1,
404 2024.
405 SECTION 24. Item 4513-1012 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
406 by striking out the figure “$27,400,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
407 each instance, the following figure:- $27,800,000.
20 of 27

408 SECTION 25. Item 4590-0912 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
409 by striking out the figure “$27,995,640”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
410 each instance, the following figure:- $29,195,640.
411 SECTION 26. Item 8100-0006 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
412 by striking out the figure “$37,250,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
413 each instance, the following figure:- $45,000,000.
414 SECTION 27. Item 9110-1630 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
415 by inserting after the word “placements” the following words:- ; and provided further, that the
416 secretary of the executive office of aging and independence may transfer funds between items
417 9110-0600, 9110-1630 and 9110-1633.
418 SECTION 28. Item 1595-1068 of section 2E of said chapter 140, as amended by section
419 127 of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the figure
420 “$444,250,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $539,980,000.
421 SECTION 29. Said item 1595-1068 of said section 2E of said chapter 140, as amended
422 by section 128 of said chapter 248, is hereby further amended by striking out the figure
423 “$837,827,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $972,235,420.
424 SECTION 30. Subsection (c) of section 202 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by
425 striking out the words “February 1” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- October
426 15.
21 of 27

427 SECTION 31. Subsection (d) of section 127 of chapter 150 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
428 amended by striking out the words “June 30” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
429 December 31.
430 SECTION 32. Subsection (d) of section 128 of said chapter 150 is hereby amended by
431 striking out the words “June 30” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- December
432 31.
433 SECTION 32A. Subsection (d) of section 303 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 is
434 hereby amended by striking out the figure “2025” and inserting in place thereof the following
435 figure:- 2026.
436 SECTION 32B. Subsection (b) of section 98 of chapter 239 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
437 amended by striking out the words “The schedule shall ensure that the distribution companies
438 enter into cost-effective long-term contracts for energy storage systems equal to approximately
439 5,000 megawatts not later than July 31, 2030, of which: (i) approximately 1,500 megawatts of
440 mid-duration storage shall be procured by July 31, 2025, and shall be for environmental
441 attributes only; (ii) approximately 1,000 megawatts of mid-duration storage shall be procured by
442 July 31, 2026; (iii) approximately 1,000 megawatts of mid-duration storage shall be procured by
443 July 31, 2027; and (iv) all remaining energy storage systems capacity shall be procured by July
444 31, 2030. Each procurement shall consider inclusion of environmental attributes, energy services
445 or a combination of both; provided, however, that the procurement of 1,500 megawatts of mid-
446 duration storage by July 31, 2025 shall be for environmental attributes only.”
22 of 27

447 SECTION 33. Item 3000-1142 of section 2A of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
448 amended by striking out the word “between” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
449 from this item to.
450 SECTION 33A. Subsection (d) of section 36 of chapter 285 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
451 amended by striking out the words “June 30, 2025” and inserting in place thereof the following
452 words:- March 30, 2026.
453 SECTION 34. Chapter 390 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking out the
454 words “public way within 3 miles of the vessel’s waterfront location of origin in the town of
455 Barnstable and which may pass over the roadways of the town of Yarmouth; provided, however,
456 that said vessel shall be trucked by a professional licensed boat hauler” and inserting in place
457 thereof the following words:- locally owned or controlled public way within 3 miles of the
458 vessel’s waterfront location of origin in the town of Barnstable and which may pass over the
459 locally owned or controlled roadways of the town of Yarmouth; provided, however, that said
460 vessel shall be trucked by a professional licensed boat hauler. For the purposes of this section,
461 public ways shall not include roadways owned or within the control of the Massachusetts
462 Department of Transportation.
463 SECTION 35. Notwithstanding sections 185A to 185E, inclusive, of chapter 140 of the
464 General Laws, as amended by sections 249 and 250 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, no person
465 shall be required to be licensed to engage in the business of selling tickets or the business of
466 reselling or facilitating a mechanism for 2 or more parties to participate in the resale of any ticket
467 of admission under said section 185A of said chapter 140 until January 1, 2026.
23 of 27

468 SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
469 comptroller shall transfer all funds currently in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, Inspector
470 General Expendable Trust to the Office of the Inspector General Recovery Fund, established in
471 section 2KKKKKK of chapter 29 of the General Laws, inserted by section 6, not later than 90
472 days from the effective date of this act.
473 SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any
474 unexpended balances, not to exceed a total of $40,000,000, in items 4000-0700 and 4000-1426
475 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 shall not revert to the General Fund until
476 September 1, 2025 and may be expended by the executive office of health and human services to
477 pay for services enumerated in said items 4000-0700 and 4000-1426 provided during fiscal year
478 2025.
479 SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
480 2025, the secretary of health and human services, with the written approval of the secretary of
481 administration and finance, may authorize transfers of surplus among items 4000-0320, 4000-
482 0430, 4000-0500, 4000-0601, 4000-0641, 4000-0700, 4000-0875, 4000-0880, 4000-0885, 4000-
483 0940, 4000-0950, 4000-0990, 4000-1400, 4000-1420 and 4000-1426.
484 SECTION 39. The salary adjustments and other economic benefits authorized by the
485 following collective bargaining agreements shall be effective for the purposes of section 7 of
486 chapter 150E of the General Laws:
487 (1) the agreement between the Sheriff of Bristol County and the National Correctional
488 Employees’ Union, Local 103, K-9 Unit, Unit SA7, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
489 2027;
24 of 27

490 (2) the agreement between the Board of Trustees of the University of Massachusetts and
491 Service Employees International Union, Local 888, Unit L95, effective from July 1, 2024
492 through June 30, 2027;
493 (3) the agreement between the Secretary of the Commonwealth and Service Employees
494 International Union, Local 888 AFL/CIO on behalf of certain employees of the Suffolk Registry
495 of Deeds, Unit SC2, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
496 (4) the agreement between the Sheriff of Bristol County and the National Correctional
497 Employees’ Union, Local 103 K-9 Unit, Unit SA7, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
498 2027;
499 (5) the agreement between the Sheriff of Plymouth County and the New England Police
500 Benevolent Association (NEPBA), Local 580 (BCI), Unit SP3, effective from July 1, 2024
501 through June 30, 2027;
502 (6) the agreement between the Sheriff of Norfolk County and the National Association of
503 Government Employees, RI Local 202, Unit SN1, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
504 2027;
505 (7) the agreement between the Sheriff of Norfolk County and the County Correctional
506 Officers Association, NEPBA Local 570, Unit SN3, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
507 2027;
508 (8) the agreement between the Board of Higher Education and the Association of
509 Professional Administrators, MTA/NEA, Unit APA, effective from July 1, 2024 through June
510 30, 2027;
25 of 27

511 (9) the agreement between the Sheriff of Norfolk County and the County Correctional
512 Officers Association, NEPBA Local 575, Unit SN2, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
513 2027;
514 (10) the agreement between the Sheriff of Hampshire County and the Hampshire
515 Sheriff’s Office Treatment Association (SOTA), Unit SH6, effective from July 1, 2024 through
516 June 30, 2027;
517 (11) the agreement between the Sheriff of Hampshire County and the Hampshire Jail and
518 House of Correction Supervisory Correctional Officers, Unit SH8, effective from July 1, 2024
519 through June 30, 2027;
520 (12) the agreement between the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and the New England
521 Police Benevolent Association, Unit 4A, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
522 (13) the agreement between the Sheriff of Barnstable County and NAGE-IBCO, Local
523 217, Unit S3B, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
524 (14) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and The American
525 Federation of State, County, and Municipal Employees, Council 93, Local 1776, AFL-CIO, Unit
526 A01, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
527 (15) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the American
528 Federation of State and County and Municipal Employees, Local 507/Council 93, AFL-CIO,
529 Unit D82, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027; and
530 (16) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the New England Police
531 Benevolent Local 290, Unit B33, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027.
26 of 27

532 SECTION 40. The department of elementary and secondary education and the board of
533 education shall update regulations, as necessary, consistent with sections 11A to 11F, inclusive.
27 of 27